Massachusetts, session 194th, H3356.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general provisions or special laws to the contrary,
nonprofit organizations shall provide the following to relevant state agencies upon the
submission of an application for state grant funding:
(1) A financial statement containing a full accounting of any existing endowment
belonging to the nonprofit.
(2) A comprehensive listing of any and all foreign donors and the amount of money,
goods and/or services donated to that organization within the last 5 years.
(3) A statement disclosing contracts with the Commonwealth for goods and/or services
rendered.
of 2

(4) A statement disclosing existing business contracts between the Commonwealth and
members of the board of directors for said organization.
SECTION 2. The office of the treasurer shall promulgate rules, regulations, and relevant
documentation pursuant to the implementation of this Act.
of 2